lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Kūdikių sveikata: Kūdikių sveikatos ir priežiūros rinkiniai; Nosies aspiratoriai; Čiulptukų segtukai ir laikikliai; Servetėlės čiulptukams; Čiulptukai ir kramtukai
da: Baby og småbørn > Babysundhed: Babysundhed og plejesæt; Næsesuger; Suttekæder og sutteholdere; Sutteservietter; Sutter og bideringe
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Zdravje dojenčka: Kompleti za zdravje in nego dojenčkov; Nosni aspiratorji; Sponke in držala za dudo; Robčki za dudo; Dude in grizala
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Υγεία μωρού: Βρεφικά σετ υγείας & περιποίησης; Αναρροφητήρας βλέννας; Κλιπ και θήκες πιπίλας; Μαντηλάκια πιπίλας; Πιπίλες & μασητικά
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 嬰兒照護: 嬰幼兒衛生保健用品組; 吸鼻器; 奶嘴鍊; 奶嘴清潔濕紙巾; 安撫奶嘴
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Babaegészség: Babaegészségügyi és -ápoló készletek; Orrszívók; Cumikapcsok és -tartók; Cumitörlőkendők; Cumik és rágókák
pt-BR: Infantil > Saúde do bebê: Kits para saúde e cuidados do bebê; Aspiradores nasais; Porta-chupetas; Lenços umedecidos para chupetas; Chupetas e mordedores
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vauvan terveys: Vauvan hoitopaketit; Imuniistimet; Tuttiklipsit ja -pidikkeet; Tutin puhdistuspyyhkeet; Vauvan tutit ja purulelut
it: Bebè e bimbi > Salute del bambino: Kit per la salute e la cura del bambino; Aspiratori nasali; Clip e pinze per ciuccio; Salviettine per ciucci; Ciucci e massaggiagengive
sv: Baby och småbarn > Hälsovård spädbarn: Kit för babyvård och skötsel; Nässugar; Napphållare och clips; Våtservetter för nappar; Nappar och bitringar
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Salud del bebé: Kits de salud y aseo del bebé; Aspiradores nasales; Clips y fundas para chupetes; Toallitas para chupetes; Chupetes y mordedores
nb: Baby og barn > Babyhelse: Helse- og velværesett for baby; Nesesugere; Smokkeklips og -holdere; Smokkekluter; Smokker og biteringer
en: Baby & Toddler > Baby Health: Baby Health & Grooming Kits; Nasal Aspirators; Pacifier Clips & Holders; Pacifier Wipes; Pacifiers & Teethers
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Sản phẩm sức khỏe dành cho em bé: Bộ sản phẩm chăm sóc sức khỏe và vệ sinh cho trẻ; Dụng cụ hút mũi; Kẹp và hộp/túi đựng núm vú giả; Khăn ướt lau núm vú giả; Núm vú giả và ngậm nướu
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Baby Gesundheitsbedarf: Baby-Gesundheits- & Pflegesets; Nasensauger; Schnullerclips & -ketten; Reinigungstücher für Schnuller; Schnuller & Beißringe
sk-SK: Bábätká > Zdravotné pomôcky pre bábätká: Súpravy starostlivosti o dieťa; Nosové odsávačky; Klipy a držiaky cumlíkov; Utierky na cumlíky; Cumlíky a hryzadlá
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Sağlığı: Bebek Sağlığı ve Bakım Setleri; Burun Aspiratörleri; Emzik Klips ve Tutucuları; Bebek Emziği Mendilleri; Emzikler ve Diş Kaşıyıcılar
nl: Baby en peuter > Gezondheidszorg voor baby's: Producten voor de (medische) verzorging van baby's; Neusaspirators; Speenclips en -houders; Schoonmaakdoekjes voor spenen; Fopspenen en bijtringen
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Puériculture: Kits pour la santé et la toilette des bébés; Mouche-bébés; Attache-sucettes; Lingettes nettoyantes pour sucettes et tétines; Sucettes et anneaux de dentition
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Saúde do bebé: Kits de saúde e higiene do bebé; Aspiradores nasais; Porta-chupetas e molas; Toalhetes para chupetas; Chupetas e mordedores
cs: Děti a kojenci > Péče o děti a kojence: Sady pomůcek pro péči o děti; Nosní odsávačky; Skřipce a držáky na dudlík; Ubrousky na dudlíky; Dudlíky a kousadla
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Sănătatea bebelușului: Seturi pentru îngrijirea și sănătatea bebelușilor; Aspiratoare nazale; Cleme și suporturi pentru suzetă; Șervețele pentru suzetă; Suzete și dispozitive pentru dentiție
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Бебешко здраве: Бебешко здраве и комплекти за грижа; Аспиратори за нос; Щипки и държачи за залъгалки; Кърпички за залъгалка; Залъгалки и гризалки
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 婴儿卫生: 婴儿健康护理套件; 吸鼻器; 奶嘴收纳; 奶嘴湿巾; 奶嘴与牙胶
ko: 영유아 > 영유아 위생용품: 유아 건강/위생 용품; 콧물 흡입기; 고무 젖꼭지 클립/홀더; 고무 젖꼭지용 물티슈; 고무 젖꼭지/치발기
ru: Товары для детей > Здоровье детей: Наборы для ухода за детьми; Назальные аспираторы; Держатели и клипсы для пустышек; Салфетки для пустышек; Соски-пустышки и зубные кольца
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Zdrowie niemowląt: Zestawy do pielęgnacji niemowląt; Aspiratory do nosa; Klipsy i uchwyty do smoczków; Chusteczki do smoczków; Smoczki i gryzaki
ja: ベビー用品 > ベビー用健康・衛生用品: ベビー用ヘルスケアキット; 鼻吸い器; おしゃぶりクリップ・おしゃぶりホルダー; おしゃぶり用除菌シート; おしゃぶり・はがため
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Zdravlje bebe: Kompleti za zdravlje i njegu beba; Aspiratori za nos; Stezaljke i držači za dudu; Maramice za dudu; Dude i grickalice za zube
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > สุขภาพทารก: ชุดสุขภาพและดูแลสำหรับทารก; ที่ดูดน้ำมูก; คลิปและที่ใส่จุกนมปลอม; ที่ทำความสะอาดจุกหลอก; จุกนมปลอมและยางกัด